RHVoiceCore/RHVoice/src/scripts/Belarusian/g2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2025  Zvonimir Stanecic <zvonimirek222@yandex.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define MultiChars 
[и:TagRuskaja] @-> || .#. _ .#. ; 

define BelRuleMap 
и:і ; 

define SoftConsonant 
bb | vv | gg | dd | zz | j | kk | ll | lj | mm | nn | pp | rr | ss | tt | ff | hh | ch | sch;
define HardConsonant 
b | w | d | zh | z | j | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | t | f | h | ts | tsh|sh|sch|ws;

define YVowelLetter 
е | Е | ё | Ё | ю | Ю | я | Я;
define VowelLetter 
а | А | и | И | о | О | у | У | ы | Ы | э | Э | YVowelLetter;

define TranscribeI и:i0 | И:i1;
define TranscribeYVowel 
е:e0 | Е:e1 | 
ё:o0 | Ё:o1 | 
ю:u0 | Ю:u1 | 
# to ae (a separate phoneme before consonant).
я:ae0 | Я:ae1;
define TranscribeHardVowel 
а:a0 | А:a1 | 
о:o0 | О:o1 | 
у:u0 | У:u1 | 
ы:y0 | Ы:y1 | 
э:e0 | Э:e1;
define TranscribeBelVowel і:ii0 | І:ii1 ; 
define TranscribeVowel 
TranscribeHardVowel | TranscribeI | TranscribeYVowel | TranscribeBelVowel;

define TranscribeBelConsonant 
{дж}:dj | 
{дз}:dz | 
{дзь}:dd | 
ґ:gh | 
{ль}:lj | 
{нь}:nn | 
{сь}:ss | 
[ц]:ts | 
{ць}:tt | 
{цц}:ts | # Double to single phoneme.
{цць}:tt ; # Double to single phoneme.

define TranscribeAsHardConsonant 
б:b | 
в:w | 
г:g | 
д:d | 
ж:zh | 
з:z | 
й:j | 
к:k | 
л:l | 
м:m | 
н:n | 
п:p | 
р:r | 
с:s | 
т:t | 
ф:f | 
х:h | 
ч:tsh | 
ш:sh | 
щ:[sh tsh] | 
ў:ws;

define TranscribeAsSoftConsonant 
б:bb | 
в:vv | 
г:gg | 
д:dd | 
ж:zh | 
з:zz | 
й:j | 
к:kk | 
л:ll | 
м:mm | 
н:nn | 
п:pp | 
р:rr | 
с:ss | 
т:tt | 
ф:ff | 
х:hh | 
ч:tsh | 
ш:sh ; 

define Apos [%' | ’ | ʼ | ‘ | ъ]; 

define Transcribe 
TranscribeBelConsonant @-> || _ ,, 
#TranscribeAsSoftConsonant [ь|Ь]:0 @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsSoftConsonant TranscribeYVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsSoftConsonant TranscribeI @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsSoftConsonant ь:j TranscribeVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsHardConsonant ъ:%' TranscribeVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsHardConsonant @-> || Apos _ ,, 
TranscribeAsHardConsonant @-> || _ ,, 
0:j TranscribeYVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeI @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeHardVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeBelVowel @-> || _ ,, 
ь @-> 0 || _ ,, 
ъ @-> 0 || _ ; 

define SpecialBelRules 
ae0:a0|ae1:a1 -> || \[m|mm] _ ; 

source stress_in_text.foma
source Latin2Cyrillic.foma

regex 
MultiChars .o. 
BelLatin2Cyrillic .o. 
[BelRuleMap ->] .o. 
[[%- | WrittenStressMark] -> 0] .o. 
#ApplyOrthoepicRules .o. 
Transcribe .o. 
[Apos -> 0] .o. 
SpecialBelRules ; 
